ubuntu.slaves.black/2/packages/hyphen-ru/src/cyryoal.tex
% accompanying patterns for cyryo generated from ruhyphal.tex
\patterns{
а1вё
а2двё
а1ё
аз3вёз
а1лё
2алёк
2амёт
ам2нёт
а1рё
ас3тём
а1тьё
1бё
бё2д1р
б3лён
б2лёс1к
б2люё
б1рёк
б2рём
б2рёх
1веё
3везё
вёд1р
1вёз
2вёрд
1вёс
в2лёк
в2лёт
1вмё
в2нёс
2в1рён
3всё3
1вьё
г1лё
г2лёт
г2нёв
г3нён
г2ноё
д1вё
1дё
.доб2рёл
2доплё
до2прё
д1рё
д2рёб
2д3рёж
д2рём
1дрёма
1дрёмы
2д3рён
дъё2м
1дьё
еб1рён
е1вё
2евёр
2е1врё
е2глё
е1ё
2ежё
е3зё
е1лё
2епё
ер1вё
е1рё
ерё3до
ерё1к2
ес2чёт
ет1вё
е1тьё
2ёб
ё1бра
ёб1ры
ё1ве
ё1во
2ё1вре
ё1ву
ё1дру
2ё3душ
2ёже
ё3зе
ёз1о2г
ё1зом
ё1ка
ё1ки
2ё1ко
2ё1кр
ёк2ро
ё1ку
ё1ла
ё1ле
ё1лу
ё1лы
2ёмуж
ё2мч
ё3на
ён2д1р
ёнс2
ёпат2
2ёпе
ё2пл
ё3пла
ёп1лу
ё3плы
ё4пн
2ёпо
ё4пт
ё1ра
ё1ре
ё3ре.
ё1ри
ё1ро
ёр3ск
ё1ру
ё1ры
ё3с2а
ё1ск
ё2с1ка.
ё2ске
ё4с1ку.
2ёсл
ё3со
ё1ст
ёс2тан
ё3сту
ё1та
2ётеч
ё1ти
ё1то
ёто1с
ёт1р
ё1ту
ё1ты
ё1тю
ё1тя
ёха2т
ёх1ато
ёх3вал
ёх3лоп
ёх1опо
ёх1ру
3жёв
жё1с2
ж2жё
за3мнё
з1вё
з2вёз
1зё
з2наё
2знё
1з2о3рё
з2отё
зот2рё
3зуё
зъё2м
2зымё
2и1вё
иг1рён
и1ё
их1рё
1каё
1кё
к3лён
к2роё
3куё
ла1стё
лё3до
лё1з2о3
лёк1л
1лён
лё2ск
лё4ска
1лёх
2лоён
1луё
3льё
1льщё
3м2нёш
3м2щё
нд2рё
не3ё
1нё
нё1б2
3номё
1ньё
од3рёб
о1ё
оё2жи
о1лё
2омё
о3м2нём
о3м2нёт
о2п1лёй
о1рё
о2скё
от1вё
2о3тёк
о3тёр
от1рёк
от1рёш
о3фё
пё1
пё2ст1р
2плён
п2лёнк
плёс1к
п1лёю
поё2ж
3прёт
причё2с1к
р2блё
1рвёт
.рё2бр
1рёзк
рё1зна
1рё1зо
рёз2у
1рёкш
3рёмо
1рёнк
рё3ста
рё3сто
род2лё
роё2м
1рьё
с2дё
се3стё
1с2ё
сёкс4
сё2ст
сёст1р
2скуё
с1лёт
с2тё
1стёл
1стён.
с3тёт.
с3тёте
стё3х
с3тёш
с3т2лё
счё2с1к
1сьё
т1вёл
т1воё
1т2ё
тё2гн
тё1зо
3тёка
тёк1л
3тёкш
тё4п1л
тёр3к
тё2ска
тё2с1ки
тё2с1ко
тё2ску
тё2хо
3т2кёт
т1ревё
3т2рё2х
т2рёшь
тро2етёс
3тьё
уг2нё
уг1рё
.уё2
у1ё
у1лё
у1рё
у1стё
у3тёр
у1тьё
у2чёб
у3шё
2х3вё
1хлёб
х2лёс
ц2вё
1чё
чёр2с
чёрст1
.чё2с1к
ч2тё
1чьё
2шлён
3шьё
ъ2ё2р
ыд2рё
ырё2х
ы3сё
ь2ё
ьё1зо
ь2щё
ю1ё
яб3рё
}
